District of Columbia statutes.
19-1308.09

Control and protection of trust property.

A trustee shall take reasonable steps to take control of and protect the trust property.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 809 of the Uniform Trust Code.